Illinois, session 104th, SB3844.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 18-185, 18-205, and 18-212 and by adding Section 618-207 as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 200/18-185)8    Sec. 18-185. Short title; definitions. This Division 5 9may be cited as the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law. As 10used in this Division 5: 11    "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for 12All Urban Consumers for all items published by the United 13States Department of Labor. 14    "Extension limitation" means, for taxable years prior to 152026: (a) the lesser of 5% or the percentage increase in the 16Consumer Price Index during the 12-month calendar year 17preceding the levy year; or (b) the rate of increase approved 18by voters under Section 18-205. 19    "Extension limitation" means, for taxable year 2026 and 20thereafter: (a) the lesser of 5% or the average percentage 21increase in the Consumer Price Index for the 10 years 22immediately preceding the levy year for which the extension 23limitation is being calculated; or (b) the rate of increase   SB3844- 2 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1approved by voters under Section 18-205. 2    "Affected county" means a county of 3,000,000 or more 3inhabitants or a county contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or 4more inhabitants. 5    "Taxing district" has the same meaning provided in Section 61-150, except as otherwise provided in this Section. For the 71991 through 1994 levy years only, "taxing district" includes 8only each non-home rule taxing district having the majority of 9its 1990 equalized assessed value within any county or 10counties contiguous to a county with 3,000,000 or more 11inhabitants. Beginning with the 1995 levy year, "taxing 12district" includes only each non-home rule taxing district 13subject to this Law before the 1995 levy year and each non-home 14rule taxing district not subject to this Law before the 1995 15levy year having the majority of its 1994 equalized assessed 16value in an affected county or counties. Beginning with the 17levy year in which this Law becomes applicable to a taxing 18district as provided in Section 18-213, "taxing district" also 19includes those taxing districts made subject to this Law as 20provided in Section 18-213. 21    "Aggregate extension" for taxing districts to which this 22Law applied before the 1995 levy year means the annual 23corporate extension for the taxing district and those special 24purpose extensions that are made annually for the taxing 25district, excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for 26the taxing district to pay interest or principal on general   SB3844- 3 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1obligation bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made 2for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 3general obligation bonds issued before October 1, 1991; (c) 4made for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 5bonds issued to refund or continue to refund those bonds 6issued before October 1, 1991; (d) made for any taxing 7district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued to 8refund or continue to refund bonds issued after October 1, 91991 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 10district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 11before October 1, 1991 for payment of which a property tax levy 12or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 13pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 14principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 15governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 16other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 17payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 18lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 19issued by the commission before October 1, 1991, to pay for the 20building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 21contracts entered into before October 1, 1991; (h) made for 22payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 23Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 24construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (i) 25made for payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, 26as defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform   SB3844- 4 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1Act, in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base 2less the amount in items (b), (c), (e), and (h) of this 3definition for non-referendum obligations, except obligations 4initially issued pursuant to referendum; (j) made for payments 5of principal and interest on bonds issued under Section 15 of 6the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made by a school 7district that participates in the Special Education District 8of Lake County, created by special education joint agreement 9under Section 10-22.31 of the School Code, for payment of the 10school district's share of the amounts required to be 11contributed by the Special Education District of Lake County 12to the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund under Article 7 of 13the Illinois Pension Code; the amount of any extension under 14this item (k) shall be certified by the school district to the 15county clerk; (l) made to fund expenses of providing joint 16recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 17Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 18the Illinois Municipal Code; (m) made for temporary relocation 19loan repayment purposes pursuant to Sections 2-3.77 and 2017-2.2d of the School Code; (n) made for payment of principal 21and interest on any bonds issued under the authority of 22Section 17-2.2d of the School Code; (o) made for contributions 23to a firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 24Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 25under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 26(p) made for road purposes in the first year after a township   SB3844- 5 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1assumes the rights, powers, duties, assets, property, 2liabilities, obligations, and responsibilities of a road 3district abolished under the provisions of Section 6-133 of 4the Illinois Highway Code; (q) made under Section 4 of the 5Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or 6to supplement existing funds for community mental health 7facilities and services, including facilities and services for 8the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 9disorder; and (r) made for the payment of principal and 10interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 1117-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 12those bonds. 13    "Aggregate extension" for the taxing districts to which 14this Law did not apply before the 1995 levy year (except taxing 15districts subject to this Law in accordance with Section 1618-213) means the annual corporate extension for the taxing 17district and those special purpose extensions that are made 18annually for the taxing district, excluding special purpose 19extensions: (a) made for the taxing district to pay interest 20or principal on general obligation bonds that were approved by 21referendum; (b) made for any taxing district to pay interest 22or principal on general obligation bonds issued before March 231, 1995; (c) made for any taxing district to pay interest or 24principal on bonds issued to refund or continue to refund 25those bonds issued before March 1, 1995; (d) made for any 26taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued   SB3844- 6 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 1, 21995 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 3district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 4before March 1, 1995 for payment of which a property tax levy 5or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 6pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 7principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 8governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 9other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 10payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 11lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 12issued by the commission before March 1, 1995 to pay for the 13building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 14contracts entered into before March 1, 1995; (h) made for 15payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 16Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 17construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (h-4) 18made for stormwater management purposes by the Metropolitan 19Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago under Section 12 20of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act; (h-8) made 21for payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 22Section 9.6a of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 23Act to make contributions to the pension fund established 24under Article 13 of the Illinois Pension Code; (i) made for 25payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, as 26defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act,   SB3844- 7 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base less 2the amount in items (b), (c), and (e) of this definition for 3non-referendum obligations, except obligations initially 4issued pursuant to referendum and bonds described in 5subsections (h) and (h-8) of this definition; (j) made for 6payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 7Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made 8for payments of principal and interest on bonds authorized by 9Public Act 88-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago 10Park District Act for aquarium or museum projects and bonds 11issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park District Act for 12the purpose of making contributions to the pension fund 13established under Article 12 of the Illinois Pension Code; (l) 14made for payments of principal and interest on bonds 15authorized by Public Act 87-1191 or 93-601 and (i) issued 16pursuant to Section 21.2 of the Cook County Forest Preserve 17District Act, (ii) issued under Section 42 of the Cook County 18Forest Preserve District Act for zoological park projects, or 19(iii) issued under Section 44.1 of the Cook County Forest 20Preserve District Act for botanical gardens projects; (m) made 21pursuant to Section 34-53.5 of the School Code, whether levied 22annually or not; (n) made to fund expenses of providing joint 23recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 24Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 25the Illinois Municipal Code; (o) made by the Chicago Park 26District for recreational programs for persons with   SB3844- 8 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1disabilities under subsection (c) of Section 7.06 of the 2Chicago Park District Act; (p) made for contributions to a 3firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 4Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 5under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 6(q) made by Ford Heights School District 169 under Section 717-9.02 of the School Code; (r) made for the purpose of making 8employer contributions to the Public School Teachers' Pension 9and Retirement Fund of Chicago under Section 34-53 of the 10School Code; (s) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental 11Health Act to provide the necessary funds or to supplement 12existing funds for community mental health facilities and 13services, including facilities and services for the person 14with a developmental disability or a substance use disorder; 15and (t) made for the payment of principal and interest on any 16bonds issued under the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the 17School Code or to refund or continue to refund those bonds. 18    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 19this Law applies in accordance with Section 18-213, except for 20those taxing districts subject to paragraph (2) of subsection 21(e) of Section 18-213, means the annual corporate extension 22for the taxing district and those special purpose extensions 23that are made annually for the taxing district, excluding 24special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing district 25to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds that 26were approved by referendum; (b) made for any taxing district   SB3844- 9 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds 2issued before the date on which the referendum making this Law 3applicable to the taxing district is held; (c) made for any 4taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 5to refund or continue to refund those bonds issued before the 6date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 7taxing district is held; (d) made for any taxing district to 8pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 9continue to refund bonds issued after the date on which the 10referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 11is held if the bonds were approved by referendum after the date 12on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 13taxing district is held; (e) made for any taxing district to 14pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before the 15date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 16taxing district is held for payment of which a property tax 17levy or the full faith and credit of the unit of local 18government is pledged; however, a tax for the payment of 19interest or principal on those bonds shall be made only after 20the governing body of the unit of local government finds that 21all other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 22payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 23lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 24issued by the commission before the date on which the 25referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 26is held to pay for the building project; (g) made for payments   SB3844- 10 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1due under installment contracts entered into before the date 2on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 3taxing district is held; (h) made for payments of principal 4and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 5Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 6the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 7(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 8obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 9referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 10bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 11Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 12interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 13the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 14airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 15installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 16before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 17a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 18fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 19persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 20District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 21Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 22fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 23the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 244-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made for the taxing 25district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 26bonds issued pursuant to Section 19-3.10 of the School Code;   SB3844- 11 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1(n) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental Health Act to 2provide the necessary funds or to supplement existing funds 3for community mental health facilities and services, including 4facilities and services for the person with a developmental 5disability or a substance use disorder; and (o) made for the 6payment of principal and interest on any bonds issued under 7the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to 8refund or continue to refund those bonds. 9    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 10this Law applies in accordance with paragraph (2) of 11subsection (e) of Section 18-213 means the annual corporate 12extension for the taxing district and those special purpose 13extensions that are made annually for the taxing district, 14excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing 15district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 16bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made for any 17taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 18obligation bonds issued before March 7, 1997 (the effective 19date of Public Act 89-718); (c) made for any taxing district to 20pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 21continue to refund those bonds issued before March 7, 1997 22(the effective date of Public Act 89-718); (d) made for any 23taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 24to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 7, 251997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) if the bonds 26were approved by referendum after March 7, 1997 (the effective   SB3844- 12 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1date of Public Act 89-718); (e) made for any taxing district to 2pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before March 37, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) for payment 4of which a property tax levy or the full faith and credit of 5the unit of local government is pledged; however, a tax for the 6payment of interest or principal on those bonds shall be made 7only after the governing body of the unit of local government 8finds that all other sources for payment are insufficient to 9make those payments; (f) made for payments under a building 10commission lease when the lease payments are for the 11retirement of bonds issued by the commission before March 7, 121997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) to pay for the 13building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 14contracts entered into before March 7, 1997 (the effective 15date of Public Act 89-718); (h) made for payments of principal 16and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 17Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 18the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 19(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 20obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 21referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 22bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 23Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 24interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 25the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 26airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed,   SB3844- 13 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 2before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 3a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 4fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 5persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 6District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 7Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 8fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 9the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 104-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made under Section 4 of 11the Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds 12or to supplement existing funds for community mental health 13facilities and services, including facilities and services for 14the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 15disorder; and (n) made for the payment of principal and 16interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 1717-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 18those bonds. 19    "Debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 20that portion of the extension for a taxing district for the 211994 levy year, or for those taxing districts subject to this 22Law in accordance with Section 18-213, except for those 23subject to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 18-213, 24for the levy year in which the referendum making this Law 25applicable to the taxing district is held, or for those taxing 26districts subject to this Law in accordance with paragraph (2)   SB3844- 14 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1of subsection (e) of Section 18-213 for the 1996 levy year, 2constituting an extension for payment of principal and 3interest on bonds issued by the taxing district without 4referendum, but not including excluded non-referendum bonds. 5For park districts (i) that were first subject to this Law in 61991 or 1995 and (ii) whose extension for the 1994 levy year 7for the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued by 8the park district without referendum (but not including 9excluded non-referendum bonds) was less than 51% of the amount 10for the 1991 levy year constituting an extension for payment 11of principal and interest on bonds issued by the park district 12without referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum 13bonds), "debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 14that portion of the extension for the 1991 levy year 15constituting an extension for payment of principal and 16interest on bonds issued by the park district without 17referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum bonds). 18A debt service extension base established or increased at any 19time pursuant to any provision of this Law, except Section 2018-212, shall be increased each year commencing with the later 21of (i) the 2009 levy year or (ii) the first levy year in which 22this Law becomes applicable to the taxing district, by the 23extension limitation lesser of 5% or the percentage increase 24in the Consumer Price Index during the 12-month calendar year 25preceding the levy year. The debt service extension base may 26be established or increased as provided under Section 18-212.   SB3844- 15 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1"Excluded non-referendum bonds" means (i) bonds authorized by 2Public Act 88-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago 3Park District Act for aquarium and museum projects; (ii) bonds 4issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform 5Act; or (iii) refunding obligations issued to refund or to 6continue to refund obligations initially issued pursuant to 7referendum. 8    "Special purpose extensions" include, but are not limited 9to, extensions for levies made on an annual basis for 10unemployment and workers' compensation, self-insurance, 11contributions to pension plans, and extensions made pursuant 12to Section 6-601 of the Illinois Highway Code for a road 13district's permanent road fund whether levied annually or not. 14The extension for a special service area is not included in the 15aggregate extension. 16    "Aggregate extension base" means the taxing district's 17last preceding aggregate extension as adjusted under Sections 1818-135, 18-215, 18-230, 18-206, and 18-233. Beginning with 19levy year 2022, for taxing districts that are specified in 20Section 18-190.7, the taxing district's aggregate extension 21base shall be calculated as provided in Section 18-190.7. An 22adjustment under Section 18-135 shall be made for the 2007 23levy year and all subsequent levy years whenever one or more 24counties within which a taxing district is located (i) used 25estimated valuations or rates when extending taxes in the 26taxing district for the last preceding levy year that resulted   SB3844- 16 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1in the over or under extension of taxes, or (ii) increased or 2decreased the tax extension for the last preceding levy year 3as required by Section 18-135(c). Whenever an adjustment is 4required under Section 18-135, the aggregate extension base of 5the taxing district shall be equal to the amount that the 6aggregate extension of the taxing district would have been for 7the last preceding levy year if either or both (i) actual, 8rather than estimated, valuations or rates had been used to 9calculate the extension of taxes for the last levy year, or 10(ii) the tax extension for the last preceding levy year had not 11been adjusted as required by subsection (c) of Section 18-135.12    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 132012, the aggregate extension base for West Northfield School 14District No. 31 in Cook County shall be $12,654,592. 15    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 16purpose of calculating the limiting rate for levy year 2023, 17the last preceding aggregate extension base for Homewood 18School District No. 153 in Cook County shall be $19,535,377. 19    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 202022, the aggregate extension base of a home equity assurance 21program that levied at least $1,000,000 in property taxes in 22levy year 2019 or 2020 under the Home Equity Assurance Act 23shall be the amount that the program's aggregate extension 24base for levy year 2021 would have been if the program had 25levied a property tax for levy year 2021. 26    "Levy year" has the same meaning as "year" under Section   SB3844- 17 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b11-155. 2    "New property" means (i) the assessed value, after final 3board of review or board of appeals action, of new 4improvements or additions to existing improvements on any 5parcel of real property that increase the assessed value of 6that real property during the levy year multiplied by the 7equalization factor issued by the Department under Section 817-30, (ii) the assessed value, after final board of review or 9board of appeals action, of real property not exempt from real 10estate taxation, which real property was exempt from real 11estate taxation for any portion of the immediately preceding 12levy year, multiplied by the equalization factor issued by the 13Department under Section 17-30, including the assessed value, 14upon final stabilization of occupancy after new construction 15is complete, of any real property located within the 16boundaries of an otherwise or previously exempt military 17reservation that is intended for residential use and owned by 18or leased to a private corporation or other entity, (iii) in 19counties that classify in accordance with Section 4 of Article 20IX of the Illinois Constitution, an incentive property's 21additional assessed value resulting from a scheduled increase 22in the level of assessment as applied to the first year final 23board of review market value, and (iv) any increase in 24assessed value due to oil or gas production from an oil or gas 25well required to be permitted under the Hydraulic Fracturing 26Regulatory Act that was not produced in or accounted for   SB3844- 18 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1during the previous levy year. In addition, the county clerk 2in a county containing a population of 3,000,000 or more shall 3include in the 1997 recovered tax increment value for any 4school district, any recovered tax increment value that was 5applicable to the 1995 tax year calculations. 6    "Qualified airport authority" means an airport authority 7organized under the Airport Authorities Act and located in a 8county bordering on the State of Wisconsin and having a 9population in excess of 200,000 and not greater than 500,000. 10    "Recovered tax increment value" means, except as otherwise 11provided in this paragraph, the amount of the current year's 12equalized assessed value, in the first year after a 13municipality terminates the designation of an area as a 14redevelopment project area previously established under the 15Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois 16Municipal Code, previously established under the Industrial 17Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously 18established under the Economic Development Project Area Tax 19Increment Act of 1995, or previously established under the 20Economic Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, of 21each taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in 22the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 23equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 24project area. For the taxes which are extended for the 1997 25levy year, the recovered tax increment value for a non-home 26rule taxing district that first became subject to this Law for   SB3844- 19 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1the 1995 levy year because a majority of its 1994 equalized 2assessed value was in an affected county or counties shall be 3increased if a municipality terminated the designation of an 4area in 1993 as a redevelopment project area previously 5established under the Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment 6Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously established 7under the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois 8Municipal Code, or previously established under the Economic 9Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, by an amount 10equal to the 1994 equalized assessed value of each taxable 11lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in the 12redevelopment project area over and above the initial 13equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 14project area. In the first year after a municipality removes a 15taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property from a 16redevelopment project area established under the Tax Increment 17Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, 18the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal 19Code, or the Economic Development Area Tax Increment 20Allocation Act, "recovered tax increment value" means the 21amount of the current year's equalized assessed value of each 22taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property removed 23from the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 24equalized assessed value of that real property before removal 25from the redevelopment project area. 26    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, "limiting   SB3844- 20 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1rate" means a fraction the numerator of which is the last 2preceding aggregate extension base (as reduced by Section 318-207, if applicable) times an amount equal to one plus the 4extension limitation defined in this Section and the 5denominator of which is the current year's equalized assessed 6value of all real property in the territory under the 7jurisdiction of the taxing district during the prior levy 8year. For those taxing districts that reduced their aggregate 9extension for the last preceding levy year, except for school 10districts that reduced their extension for educational 11purposes pursuant to Section 18-206 and taxing districts that 12reduced their aggregate extension pursuant to Section 18-207, 13the highest aggregate extension in any of the last 3 preceding 14levy years shall be used for the purpose of computing the 15limiting rate. The denominator shall not include new property 16or the recovered tax increment value. If a new rate, a rate 17decrease, or a limiting rate increase has been approved at an 18election held after March 21, 2006, then (i) the otherwise 19applicable limiting rate shall be increased by the amount of 20the new rate or shall be reduced by the amount of the rate 21decrease, as the case may be, or (ii) in the case of a limiting 22rate increase, the limiting rate shall be equal to the rate set 23forth in the proposition approved by the voters for each of the 24years specified in the proposition, after which the limiting 25rate of the taxing district shall be calculated as otherwise 26provided. In the case of a taxing district that obtained   SB3844- 21 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1referendum approval for an increased limiting rate on March 220, 2012, the limiting rate for tax year 2012 shall be the rate 3that generates the approximate total amount of taxes 4extendable for that tax year, as set forth in the proposition 5approved by the voters; this rate shall be the final rate 6applied by the county clerk for the aggregate of all capped 7funds of the district for tax year 2012.8(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-587, eff. 5-28-24; 9103-591, eff. 7-1-24; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 104-417, eff. 108-15-25.) 11    (35 ILCS 200/18-205)12    Sec. 18-205. Referendum to increase the extension 13limitation. A taxing district is limited to an extension 14limitation as defined in Section 18-185 of 5% or the 15percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 1612-month calendar year preceding the levy year, whichever is 17less. A taxing district may increase its extension limitation 18for one or more levy years if that taxing district holds a 19referendum before the levy date for the first levy year at 20which a majority of voters voting on the issue approves 21adoption of a higher extension limitation. Referenda shall be 22conducted at a regularly scheduled election in accordance with 23the Election Code. The question shall be presented in 24substantially the following manner for all elections held 25after March 21, 2006:  SB3844- 22 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1        Shall the extension limitation under the Property Tax 2    Extension Limitation Law for (insert the legal name, 3    number, if any, and county or counties of the taxing 4    district and geographic or other common name by which a 5    school or community college district is known and referred 6    to), Illinois, be increased from (the extension limitation 7    under item (a) of the definition of extension limitation 8    in Section 18-185) the lesser of 5% or the percentage 9    increase in the Consumer Price Index over the prior levy 10    year to (insert the percentage of the proposed increase)% 11    per year for (insert each levy year for which the 12    increased extension limitation will apply)?13The votes must be recorded as "Yes" or "No". 14If a majority of voters voting on the issue approves the 15adoption of the increase, the increase shall be applicable for 16each levy year specified.17    The ballot for any question submitted pursuant to this 18Section shall have printed thereon, but not as a part of the 19question submitted, only the following supplemental 20information (which shall be supplied to the election authority 21by the taxing district) in substantially the following form:22        (1) For the (insert the first levy year for which the 23    increased extension limitation will be applicable) levy 24    year the approximate amount of the additional tax 25    extendable against property containing a single family 26    residence and having a fair market value at the time of the   SB3844- 23 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1    referendum of $100,000 is estimated to be $....2        (2) Based upon an average annual percentage increase 3    (or decrease) in the market value of such property of ...% 4    (insert percentage equal to the average annual percentage 5    increase or decrease for the prior 3 levy years, at the 6    time the submission of the question is initiated by the 7    taxing district, in the amount of (A) the equalized 8    assessed value of the taxable property in the taxing 9    district less (B) the new property included in the 10    equalized assessed value), the approximate amount of the 11    additional tax extendable against such property for the 12    ... levy year is estimated to be $... and for the ... levy 13    year is estimated to be $....14    Paragraph (2) shall be included only if the increased 15extension limitation will be applicable for more than one year 16and shall list each levy year for which the increased 17extension limitation will be applicable. The additional tax 18shown for each levy year shall be the approximate dollar 19amount of the increase over the amount of the most recently 20completed extension at the time the submission of the question 21is initiated by the taxing district. The approximate amount of 22the additional tax extendable shown in paragraphs (1) and (2) 23shall be calculated by multiplying $100,000 (the fair market 24value of the property without regard to any property tax 25exemptions) by (i) the percentage level of assessment 26prescribed for that property by statute, or by ordinance of   SB3844- 24 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1the county board in counties that classify property for 2purposes of taxation in accordance with Section 4 of Article 3IX of the Illinois Constitution; (ii) the most recent final 4equalization factor certified to the county clerk by the 5Department of Revenue at the time the taxing district 6initiates the submission of the proposition to the electors; 7(iii) the last known aggregate extension base of the taxing 8district at the time the submission of the question is 9initiated by the taxing district; and (iv) the difference 10between the percentage increase proposed in the question and 11the otherwise applicable extension limitation lesser of 5% or 12the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for the 13prior levy year (or an estimate of the percentage increase for 14the prior levy year if the increase is unavailable at the time 15the submission of the question is initiated by the taxing 16district); and dividing the result by the last known equalized 17assessed value of the taxing district at the time the 18submission of the question is initiated by the taxing 19district. This amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly is 20intended to clarify the existing requirements of this Section, 21and shall not be construed to validate any prior non-compliant 22referendum language. Any notice required to be published in 23connection with the submission of the question shall also 24contain this supplemental information and shall not contain 25any other supplemental information. Any error, miscalculation, 26or inaccuracy in computing any amount set forth on the ballot   SB3844- 25 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1or in the notice that is not deliberate shall not invalidate or 2affect the validity of any proposition approved. Notice of the 3referendum shall be published and posted as otherwise required 4by law, and the submission of the question shall be initiated 5as provided by law. 6(Source: P.A. 97-1087, eff. 8-24-12.) 7    (35 ILCS 200/18-207 new)8    Sec. 18-207. Reduced aggregate extension base.9    (a) Upon submission of a petition signed by a number of 10voters of the taxing district that is not less than 10% of the 11votes cast in the taxing district at the immediately preceding 12gubernatorial election, the question of whether a taxing 13district shall reduce its aggregate extension base for the 14purpose of lowering its limiting rate for future years shall 15be submitted to the voters of the taxing district at the next 16general or consolidated election. The petition shall set forth 17the amount of the reduction and the levy years for which the 18reduction shall be applicable. 19    (b) The petition shall be filed with the applicable 20election authority, as defined in Section 1-3 of the Election 21Code, or, in the case of multiple election authorities, with 22the State Board of Elections, not more than 10 months nor less 23than 6 months prior to the election at which the question is to 24be submitted to the voters, and its validity shall be 25determined as provided by Article 28 of the Election Code and   SB3844- 26 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1general election law. The election authority or Board, as 2applicable, shall certify the question and the proper election 3authority or authorities shall submit the question to the 4voters. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, this 5referendum shall be subject to all other general election law 6requirements. 7    (c) The proposition seeking to reduce the aggregate 8extension base shall be in substantially the following form: 9        Shall the aggregate extension base used to calculate 10    the limiting rate for (taxing district) under the Property 11    Tax Extension Limitation Law be reduced by (amount of 12    money expressed in U.S. dollars) for (levy year or years)? 13    Votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No". 14    If a majority of all votes cast on the proposition are in 15favor of the proposition, then the aggregate extension base 16shall be reduced as provided in the referendum.  17    (35 ILCS 200/18-212)18    Sec. 18-212. Referendum on debt service extension base. A 19taxing district may establish or increase its debt service 20extension base if (i) that taxing district holds a referendum 21before the date on which the levy must be filed with the county 22clerk of the county or counties in which the taxing district is 23situated and (ii) a majority of voters voting on the issue 24approves the establishment of or increase in the debt service 25extension base. A debt service extension base established or   SB3844- 27 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1increased by a referendum held pursuant to this Section after 2February 2, 2010, shall be increased each year, commencing 3with the first levy year beginning after the date of the 4referendum, by the extension limitation lesser of 5% or the 5percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 612-month calendar year preceding the levy year if the optional 7language concerning the annual increase is included in the 8question submitted to the electors of the taxing district. 9Referenda under this Section shall be conducted at a regularly 10scheduled election in accordance with the Election Code. The 11governing body of the taxing district shall certify the 12question to the proper election authorities who shall submit 13the question to the electors of the taxing district in 14substantially the following form:15        "Shall the debt service extension base under the 16    Property Tax Extension Limitation Law for ... (taxing 17    district name) ... for payment of principal and interest 18    on limited bonds be .... ((established at $ ....) . (or) 19    (increased from $ .... to $ ....)) .. for the ..... levy 20    year and all subsequent levy years (optional language:, 21    such debt service extension base to be increased each year 22    by (extension limitation amount) the lesser of 5% or the 23    percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 24    12-month calendar year preceding the levy year)?"25    Votes on the question shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No".26    If a majority of voters voting on the issue approves the   SB3844- 28 -LRB104 19189 HLH 32634 b1establishment of or increase in the debt service extension 2base, the establishment of or increase in the debt service 3extension base shall be applicable for the levy years 4specified.5(Source: P.A. 96-1202, eff. 7-22-10.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.